Nevada, session 83, SB131.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 389.031 is hereby amended to read as follows:
389.031 1. The Department, in consultation with persons and
organizations who possess knowledge and expertise in the teaching
of personal safety of children [,] and the prevention of human
trafficking, shall develop:
(a) Age-appropriate curriculum standards based on best
practices for teaching the personal safety of children to pupils in
kindergarten and grades 1 to 12, inclusive.
(b) Age-appropriate curriculum standards based on best
practices for providing instruction in the prevention of human
trafficking to pupils in grades 6 to 12, inclusive.
(c) Recommendations to assist a school district or charter school
in developing:
(1) A training plan to ensure that at least one employee at
each school, as designated by the principal, receives training on the
personal safety of children [;] and the prevention of human
trafficking;
(2) Educational materials and information to be distributed to
parents, guardians or other caretakers of pupils regarding the
personal safety of children and how and when to teach and reinforce
concepts and skills of the personal safety of children; [and]
(3) Educational materials and information to be distributed
to parents, guardians or other caretakers of pupils regarding
instruction in the prevention of human trafficking; and
(4) Policies and procedures for the referral of a child who has
reported or experienced an incident that did or could have
threatened his or her personal safety, and his or her family or
guardian, if appropriate, to various services, including, without
limitation, counseling or any other available services or resources.
[(c)] (d) Recommendations of existing research-based programs
and curriculum samples to be considered for implementation.
2. The Department will review the standards and
recommendations developed pursuant to subsection 1 on an annual
basis to ensure that those standards and recommendations contain
current information.
3. The Department may apply for and accept grants, gifts,
donations, bequests or devises from any public or private source to
carry out the provisions of this section.
4. As used in this section [, “personal] :
(a) “Instruction in the prevention of human trafficking”
means age-appropriate instruction regarding:
-
*SB131*

– 3 –
(1) The prevalence and nature of human trafficking,
including human trafficking of minors;
(2) Strategies to reduce the risk of becoming a victim of
human trafficking; and
(3) Methods for safely seeking assistance if a pupil becomes
a victim of or is at risk of becoming a victim of human trafficking.
(b) “Personal safety of children” means an age-appropriate
recognition of various hazards and dangers that are particular to
children, including, without limitation, the danger associated with
unsafe persons, both known and unknown to the child, abuse,
becoming lost or separated from a parent or guardian, and an
awareness of age-appropriate steps a child may take to avoid, lessen
or alleviate those hazards and dangers, including, without limitation,
reporting threats of harm to a responsible adult.
Sec. 2. NRS 389.064 is hereby amended to read as follows:
389.064 1. The board of trustees of each school district and
the governing body of each charter school shall ensure that
instruction in the personal safety of children [,] and instruction in
the prevention of human trafficking, based on the standards
developed by the Department pursuant to NRS 389.031, be
implemented as part of a course of study in health prescribed
pursuant to paragraph (c) of subsection 3 of NRS 389.018.
2. The school district and the charter school, in accordance
with the recommendations provided by the Department pursuant to
subsection 1 of NRS 389.031, shall determine, for the instruction
required by subsection 1:
(a) The content of and materials to be used to provide the
instruction; and
(b) The grade levels in which the instruction will be provided.
3. A person who provides the instruction required by
subsection 1 must be:
(a) A licensed teacher;
(b) An employee of the school district with special knowledge
or training in the teaching of the personal safety of children [;] or
providing instruction in the prevention of human trafficking;
(c) An employee of an agency which has as its primary purpose
the teaching of the personal safety of children [;] or the prevention
of human trafficking;
(d) An employee of a law enforcement agency; or
(e) A volunteer of an agency which has as its primary purpose
the teaching of the personal safety of children or the prevention of
human trafficking and who meets the requirements of subsection 8.
4. The school district and the charter school shall develop a
procedure for the notification of the parent or guardian of each pupil
-
*SB131*

– 4 –
to whom the instruction required by subsection 1 is to be provided.
The procedure must inform the parent or guardian that:
(a) The parent or guardian may submit a written request that the
pupil be excused from some or all of the instruction, except when
the instruction is included in a course which is required for
graduation; and
(b) All instructional materials to be used in the instruction
required by subsection 1 are available for inspection by the parent or
guardian at reasonable times and locations before the instruction is
provided.
5. A pupil whose parent or guardian submits a written request
pursuant to paragraph (a) of subsection 4 must be excused from such
instruction without any penalty as to credits or academic standing.
6. The school district and the charter school shall consider the
recommendations developed by the Department pursuant to
paragraph [(b)] (c) of subsection 1 of NRS 389.031 and, to the
extent money is available for this purpose, develop and implement:
(a) A training plan to ensure that all school employees receive
training as to the teaching of the personal safety of children [;] and
providing instruction in the prevention of human trafficking;
(b) Educational materials and information to be distributed to
parents, guardians or other caretakers of pupils regarding the
teaching of the personal safety of children [;] and instruction in the
prevention of human trafficking; and
(c) Policies and procedures for the referral of a child who has
reported or experienced an incident that did or could have
threatened his or her personal safety, and his or her family or
guardian, if appropriate, to various services, including, without
limitation, counseling or any other available services or resources.
7. On or before August 1 of each year, each board of trustees
and each governing body shall report to the Department for the
preceding year:
(a) The grade levels in which the instruction required by
subsection 1 was conducted;
(b) The curriculum content and materials distributed and utilized
for the instruction required by subsection 1;
(c) The person, persons or agency utilized to provide the
instruction required by subsection 1; and
(d) The number of reports or disclosures by pupils of incidents
that did or could have threatened their personal safety during the
preceding school year.
8. An agency which has as its primary purpose the teaching of
the personal safety of children [,] or the prevention of human
trafficking, before allowing any volunteer of the agency to provide
-
*SB131*

– 5 –
instruction pursuant to paragraph (e) of subsection 3, must ensure
that the volunteer has successfully completed:
(a) A national background check, which must include, without
limitation, a report of the criminal history of the volunteer from the
Federal Bureau of Investigation and the Central Repository for
Nevada Records of Criminal History;
(b) A child abuse and neglect screening through the Statewide
Central Registry for the Collection of Information Concerning the
Abuse or Neglect of a Child established pursuant to NRS 432.100;
and
(c) Adequate and appropriate training specific to providing
instruction regarding the personal safety of children [.] or
instruction in the prevention of human trafficking.
9. An agency which has as its primary purpose the teaching of
the personal safety of children or the prevention of human
trafficking shall, upon request from a school district or charter
school and to the extent allowed by federal law, make available to
the school district or charter school documentation of the agency’s
conclusions regarding a volunteer’s successful completion of the
requirements of subsection 8.
10. A board of trustees of a school district and a governing
body of a charter school may apply for and accept grants, gifts,
donations, bequests or devises from any public or private source to
carry out the provisions of this section.
11. As used in this section [, “personal] :
(a) “Instruction in the prevention of human trafficking” has
the meaning ascribed to it in NRS 389.031.
(b) “Personal safety of children” has the meaning ascribed to it
in NRS 389.031.
Sec. 3. 1. This section becomes effective upon passage and
approval.
2. Sections 1 and 2 of this act become effective:
(a) Upon passage and approval for the purpose of adopting any
regulations and performing any other preparatory administrative
tasks that are necessary to carry out the provisions of this act; and
(b) On July 1, 2026, for all other purposes.
H
-
*SB131*